Hawaii, session 2026, SB2011.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that in emergencies, quicker response times increase the likelihood of favorable outcomes.  Ensuring that emergency responders can quickly locate the response address helps the emergency responders arrive in a timely manner. When street addresses are readable and visible from the street, emergency responders can quickly locate the response address without sacrificing critical moments.  Delays in locating the address can contribute to property damage and result in more severe health consequences for the patient. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to facilitate prompt emergency response times by requiring each county to require the clear display of street addresses for all commercial and residential buildings.  More specifically this Act requires each county to: (1)  Adopt display standards for street addresses, including requirements that the street address is visible and readable from the street and at least two inches in height; and (2)  Require each residential and commercial building owner to display the street address of the building in accordance with the display standards. SECTION 2.  Chapter 46, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§46- Street addresses.  No later than January 1, 2027, each county shall: (1)  Adopt display standards for street addresses that: (A)  Designate the location where the address shall be posted so that the address is visible from the nearest street; (B)  Require the address to be readable at all times, including at night; and (C)  Require the address to be at least two inches in height; provided that each county may establish additional or more restrictive display standards for street addresses to facilitate prompt emergency response; and (2)  Require each owner of a residential or commercial building to post the street address of the building in accordance with the display standards established by the county." SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________